Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1927
Original cause in Supreme Court; complete record upon final determination; waiver.

A complete record of every original cause in the Supreme Court, as soon as it is finally determined, shall be made by the clerk of such court, unless both parties shall declare in open court, at the term at which the final order or judgment shall be made or hearing had, their agreement that no record shall be made.

G.S.1873, c. 57, § 12, p. 713;

Laws 1899, c. 86, § 1, p. 342;

R.S.1913, § 8200;

C.S.1922, § 9152;

C.S.1929, § 20-1927;

R.S.1943, § 25-1927.